Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-111
Commission; investigatory powers.

The commission shall investigate any and all cases of alleged neglect or violation of the laws of this state within the jurisdiction of the commission as enumerated in section 75-109.01 and take such action with reference to the neglect or violation as may be provided by law.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 11, p. 1357;

Laws 1989, LB 78, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 424, § 3;

Laws 2008, LB755, § 1.

The Public Service Commission has exclusive power and jurisdiction to inquire into complaints concerning telephone rates and where service is woefully inadequate, may require rebates. Myers v. Blair Tel. Co., 194 Neb. 55, 230 N.W.2d 190 (1975).